Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-162.04
State Forester; personnel; employment.

In carrying out sections 85-162.01 to 85-162.05, the Board of Regents may employ such personnel to work under the State Forester as it shall deem necessary or advisable.

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 4, p. 1975;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 85-163.05;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 412;

Laws 2005, LB 39, § 1.